Maryland, session 2026, HB0160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
TITLE 9. STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT REAL PROPERTY NAMING.
9–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0160*

HOUSE BILL 160
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CONFEDERATE NAME” MEANS A ANY NAME THAT COMMEMORATES OR
REFERENCES ANY ASPECT OF THE STATES IN REBELLION, OPERATING AS THE
CONFEDERATE STATES OF AMERICA, FROM 1861 TO 1865 OR ANY PERSON WHO OR
ENTITY THAT SERVED VOLUNTARILY WITH OR ON BEHALF OF THE CONFEDERATE
STATES OF AMERICA IN ANY MILITARY OR CIVILIAN CAPACITY.
(C) “POLITICAL SUBDIVISION” MEANS:
(1) A COUNTY;
(2) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(3) AN UNINCORPORATED TOWN;
(4) A SCHOOL DISTRICT; OR
(5) A SPECIAL DISTRICT; OR
(6) THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION.
(D) “REAL PROPERTY” INCLUDES STREETS, BUILDINGS, PARKS, AND
SUBDIVISIONS.
(E) “STATE ENTITY” INCLUDES ALL UNITS AND AGENCIES IN THE
EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE, AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
9–102.
A STATE ENTITY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT
ASSIGN A CONFEDERATE NAME TO REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE STATE OR
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any real property, as defined under § 9–101 of the General Provisions Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, that has a Confederate name, as defined under § 9–101
of the General Provisions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, before the effective
date of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 160 3
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.